Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-714
Proceedings under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, sections 42-714 to 42-732 apply to all proceedings under the act.

(b) An individual petitioner or a support enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under the act by filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly in a tribunal of another state or a foreign country which has or can obtain personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 727, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 55;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 15.